Linux/l10n/ispell/ukrainian.dict
вжити/O
важити/O
вантажити/O
вдосконалювати/K
вел╕ти/N
верт╕ти/N
вчад╕ти/N
вивантажити/O
виварювати/K
виговорювати/K
вигор╕ти/N
вижити/O
видавлювати/K
видоювати/K
викурювати/K
викип╕ти/N
викроювати/K
викор╕нювати/K
вилет╕ти/N
виловлювати/K
випалювати/K
висвердлювати/K
вис╕ти/N
вислужити/O
висм╕ювати/K
виснажити/O
вистежити/O
вистоювати/K
височ╕ти/N
визублювати/K
визр╕ти/N
вц╕л╕ти/N
в╕дважити/O
в╕двалювати/K
в╕дфутболювати/K
в╕джити/O
в╕дчалювати/K
в╕дчужити/O
в╕д╕гр╕ти/N
в╕дкашлювати/K
в╕дкреслювати/K
в╕длет╕ти/N
в╕длупцювати/K
в╕дм╕рювати/K
в╕дпилювати/K
в╕дрегулювати/K
в╕дсид╕ти/N
в╕дслужити/O
в╕дстежити/O
в╕дстоювати/K
в╕дшум╕ти/N
в╕дб╕лювати/K
вломлювати/K
врегулювати/K
всид╕ти/N
втихомирювати/K
втомлювати/K
волод╕ти/N
ворожити/O
воювати/K
гармон╕ювати/K
гуд╕ти/N
густ╕ти/N
градуювати/K
груб╕ти/N
груб╕ян╕ти/N
гримот╕ти/N
гов╕ти/N
гомон╕ти/N
горювати/K
гостювати/K
формулювати/K
жал╕ти/N
живот╕ти/N
жити/O
жовт╕ти/N
жонглювати/K
анулювати/K
апелювати/K
асим╕лювати/K
деф╕лювати/K
дуд╕ти/N
дурн╕ти/N
дублювати/K
дим╕ти/N
дисгармон╕ювати/K
днювати/K
дзвен╕ти/N
догляд╕ти/N
доголювати/K
дожити/O
домалювати/K
доповнювати/K
дорожити/O
досид╕ти/N
дотерп╕ти/N
евакуювати/K
емалювати/K
щем╕ти/N
ув╕чнювати/K
удостоювати/K
учителювати/K
укрупнювати/K
улет╕ти/N
уповноважити/O
упод╕бнювати/K
усв╕домлювати/K
усереднювати/K
утворювати/K
ут╕лювати/K
узагальнювати/K
убож╕ти/N
черств╕ти/N
чорн╕ти/N
царювати/K
╕н╕ц╕ювати/K
╕нтерполювати/K
╕ржав╕ти/N
калькулювати/K
кам'ян╕ти/N
кап╕тулювати/K
киш╕ти/N
комп╕лювати/K
конструювати/K
коп╕ювати/K
костен╕ти/N
лупцювати/K
лис╕ти/N
лют╕ти/N
малювати/K
мерехт╕ти/N
меблювати/K
мужн╕ти/N
м╕цн╕ти/N
множити/O
мружити/O
модулювати/K
молод╕ти/N
навантажити/O
наварювати/K
наговорювати/K
нажити/O
над╕ти/N
надпилювати/K
надолужити/O
нац╕лювати/K
накреслювати/K
намалювати/K
нам╕нювати/K
наплювати/K
напружити/O
наповнювати/K
настроювати/K
насторожити/O
назр╕ти/N
недоглед╕ти/N
недолюблювати/K
н╕велювати/K
н╕м╕ти/N
паплюжити/O
парод╕ювати/K
переважити/O
перевалювати/K
перевантажити/O
перевтомлювати/K
перегр╕ти/N
пережити/O
передражнювати/K
перекреслювати/K
переманювати/K
перемножити/O
перепалювати/K
перепр╕ти/N
переповнювати/K
перетворювати/K
перезр╕ти/N
перехоплювати/K
переосмислювати/K
пуст╕ти/N
п╕дгор╕ти/N
п╕ддражнювати/K
п╕дклеювати/K
п╕дкр╕плювати/K
п╕длет╕ти/N
п╕дмалювати/K
п╕дпалювати/K
п╕др╕внювати/K
п╕дсмажити/O
п╕дхоплювати/K
п╕дбурювати/K
пл╕шив╕ти/N
плювати/K
привласнювати/K
приворожити/O
причалювати/K
приколювати/K
прилет╕ти/N
примножити/O
примружити/O
пришпилювати/K
прогулювати/K
прогрим╕ти/N
прогор╕ти/N
прожити/O
продовжити/O
пром╕нювати/K
пропот╕ти/N
просид╕ти/N
прослужити/O
простоювати/K
прозр╕ти/N
п'ян╕ти/N
повис╕ти/N
поган╕ти/N
погор╕ти/N
погостювати/K
пожити/O
пожовт╕ти/N
подружити/O
подовжити/O
подобр╕ти/N
почорн╕ти/N
покашлювати/K
полум'ян╕ти/N
помертв╕ти/N
помножити/O
помолод╕ти/N
поневолювати/K
попот╕ти/N
пор╕д╕ти/N
посив╕ти/N
посилювати/K
посин╕ти/N
послужити/O
постар╕ти/N
потемн╕ти/N
потерп╕ти/N
потужити/O
потривожити/O
позиц╕ювати/K
пошум╕ти/N
рад╕ти/N
регулювати/K
ряб╕ти/N
розважити/O
розвалювати/K
розвантажити/O
розжарювати/K
розжир╕ти/N
розщеплювати/K
розумн╕ти/N
роз╕мл╕ти/N
розклеювати/K
розмелювати/K
розпорювати/K
розстр╕лювати/K
розтривожити/O
розширювати/K
розхот╕ти/N
розбазарювати/K
сверб╕ти/N
св╕тл╕ти/N
сив╕ти/N
симулювати/K
сип╕ти/N
с╕р╕ти/N
скип╕ти/N
скоплювати/K
служити/O
смажити/O
см╕ти/N
спилювати/K
сп'ян╕ти/N
створювати/K
стар╕ти/N
стежити/O
стукот╕ти/N
стривожити/O
стороп╕ти/N
схвилювати/K
тверез╕ти/N
темн╕ти/N
терп╕ти/N
тужити/O
тунелювати/K
тупот╕ти/N
тремт╕ти/N
тяж╕ти/N
торохт╕ти/N
зволожити/O
зголодн╕ти/N
заваг╕тн╕ти/N
завалювати/K
завантажити/O
загуд╕ти/N
заглиблювати/K
загруб╕ти/N
загор╕ти/N
зажити/O
задавлювати/K
задуб╕ти/N
зац╕пен╕ти/N
закамуфлювати/K
закип╕ти/N
заклювати/K
залет╕ти/N
заманювати/K
замружити/O
зан╕м╕ти/N
запалювати/K
запихт╕ти/N
заплювати/K
засвист╕ти/N
засвоювати/K
заскрип╕ти/N
заслужити/O
засоп╕ти/N
затанцювати/K
затужити/O
затремт╕ти/N
зашелест╕ти/N
зашип╕ти/N
зашторювати/K
захир╕ти/N
захрумт╕ти/N
захот╕ти/N
забарвлювати/K
здур╕ти/N
зелен╕ти/N
зум╕ти/N
зумовлювати/K
зубож╕ти/N
злет╕ти/N
зловжити/O
змарн╕ти/N
зм╕цн╕ти/N
зм╕цнювати/K
зневажити/O
зненавид╕ти/N
знебарвлювати/K
зрад╕ти/N
зр╕вноважити/O
зрозум╕ти/N
збентежити/O
збожевол╕ти/N
зорювати/K
ясн╕ти/N
шал╕ти/N
шум╕ти/N
хвор╕ти/N
хлюпот╕ти/N
хмурн╕ти/N
хрип╕ти/N
хот╕ти/N
балд╕ти/N
бентежити/O
будоражити/O
б╕л╕ти/N
блювати/K
бродяжити/O
божевол╕ти/N
оволод╕ти/N
одурманювати/K
ок╕льцювати/K
омертв╕ти/N
осв╕жити/O
осв╕тлювати/K
осирот╕ти/N
оскаржити/O
остовп╕ти/N
отуп╕ти/N
ототожнювати/K
обважн╕ти/N
обважнювати/K
обжарювати/K
обжити/O
обессил╕ти/N
обурювати/K
об╕гр╕ти/N
обкреслювати/K
облет╕ти/N
обложити/O
обмежити/O
обм╕нювати/K
обслужити/O
обстежити/O
обтяжити/O
обзвонювати/K
обхоплювати/K
